Utah statutes.
53-6-311.   Voluntary relinquishment of dispatcher certification.

(1) (a)  A dispatcher may voluntarily relinquish the dispatcher's certification to the division at any time when a disciplinary issue regarding the dispatcher has been referred to the division.

(b)  A dispatcher who voluntarily relinquishes certification under this Subsection (1) may not subsequently be certified as a dispatcher in Utah.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to a dispatcher whose certification has become inactive as provided in Section 53-6-306.

